Tennessee statutes. Title 13 Public Planning And Housing
Chapter 22

Housing Rehabilitation

13-22-101. Chapter definitions.

As used in this chapter, unless the context otherwise requires:

“Agency” means the housing development agency, created pursuant to § 13-23-104;

“Cost of rehabilitation” means the sum total of the costs incurred by an owner and approved by the agency as reasonable and necessary for carrying out the rehabilitation of housing accommodation or accommodations. These costs may include property acquisition, interim financing, refinancing, plans and specifications, architectural, legal and engineering services, labor, materials, supplies and all other services;

“Financial institution” or “mortgage lender” means any commercial bank, trust company, national banking association, savings and loan association, federal savings and loan association, credit union, federal credit union, insurance company, pension fund or retirement system, or any other individual, partnership, trust association or agency which is authorized to transact business in this state and which is approved by the agency as eligible for insurance hereunder; “financial institution” or “mortgage lender” includes the housing development agency;

“Housing accommodation” means any building or structure, or portion thereof, and facilities incidental thereto, which is occupied or used, or is intended to be occupied or used, as the residence or home of one (1) or more persons or families;

“Mortgage” or “insurable mortgage” means a mortgage loan and deed of trust, or other instrument, which constitutes a first lien on improvements and real property in this state held in fee simple or on a leasehold under a lease having a remaining term, at the time a mortgage is insured under this chapter, of at least twenty percent (20%) greater duration than the remaining term of the loan obligation secured by such mortgage deed of trust;

“Mortgage insurance fund” means the mortgage insurance fund established pursuant to § 13-22-105;

“Mortgage insurance fund requirement” means as of any particular date of computation, an amount of money equal to the aggregate of:

The insured amounts of mortgages in default as determined by the agency pursuant to its contracts to insure the mortgages;

An amount equal to five percent (5%) of the sum of the insured amounts under the agency's remaining insurance contracts in force; and

An amount equal to five percent (5%) of the sum of amounts to be insured under the agency's commitments to insure;

“Mortgagee” means the original mortgage lender under an insurable mortgage, and its successors and assigns, as approved by the agency;

“Mortgagor” means the original borrower under an insurable mortgage, and such original borrower's successors and assigns, as approved by the agency;

“Owner” means any person, firm, partnership or agency, either public or private, having the legal or beneficial ownership of a housing accommodation or of a building, structure, or property containing one (1) or more housing accommodations;

“Rehabilitation” means the alteration, improvement or repair of one (1) or more housing accommodations and facilities incidental thereto, intended to raise the housing accommodations to the design and condition required for use;

“Rehabilitation loan” means a loan made by a financial institution for the purpose of undertaking rehabilitation of a housing accommodation and which otherwise complies with the conditions established pursuant to this chapter; and

“State” means the state of Tennessee.

Acts 1973, ch. 313, § 1; 1974, ch. 579, § 1; 1975, ch. 339, § 1; 1977, ch. 360, § 1; T.C.A., § 13-2201; Acts 1988, ch. 901, §§ 3, 4.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 1988, ch. 901, § 2 provided that it was the legislative intent of that act to transfer, in full, the obligations, rights, duties, and funds of the Tennessee housing rehabilitation corporation to the Tennessee housing development agency.

Acts 1988, ch. 901, § 6 provided that, notwithstanding the provisions of § 4-29-112, or any other law to the contrary, the former Tennessee housing rehabilitation corporation, created by § 13-22-103, shall terminate and cease all activities by August 31, 1988.

13-22-102. Qualification of housing for mortgage insurance.

The agency may approve a housing accommodation for mortgage insurance, with such terms and conditions as the agency may prescribe; provided, that, as of the date of issuance of the insurance, the housing accommodation securing the mortgage:

Is occupied or used, or is intended to be occupied or used, by the mortgagor as the mortgagor's residence;

Contains, or upon completion of any rehabilitation will contain, no substantial violation of any applicable building or housing code, fire ordinance, or health regulation, and is not, or will not be, considered substandard or in a deteriorating or dilapidated condition; and

Has a remaining useful life, or will have upon completion of any rehabilitation, of no less than one hundred twenty percent (120%) of the terms of the mortgage loan.

The agency may approve any housing accommodation for a commitment for mortgage insurance, upon such terms and conditions as the agency may prescribe; provided, that, prior to the issuance of the commitment, there has been submitted to the agency a plan, satisfactory to the agency, to render the housing accommodation in conformance with the requirements of subsection (a). A commitment to insure a mortgage loan for a housing accommodation may include provisions, as established by the agency in accordance with its rules and regulations, for the insuring of work progress payments or draws, paid out for the cost of rehabilitation as the work progresses, protecting the interests of the mortgagor and mortgagee.

The agency may approve a housing accommodation for mortgage insurance which does not presently require improvement, repair, or rehabilitation; provided, that it is located in a code enforcement area, older urban neighborhood, an area of historic or community importance, a rural community, or an area specifically designated by the agency as a reinvestment area.

Acts 1973, ch. 313, § 2; 1975, ch. 339, § 2; 1977, ch. 360, § 2; T.C.A., § 13-2202; Acts 1988, ch. 901, § 4.

13-22-103. Continuation of agency — Termination — Payment of claims.

The agency shall continue until terminated by law; provided, that no such law shall take effect so long as the agency has commitments to insure mortgages, contracts of mortgage insurance, or other obligations outstanding, unless adequate provision has been made for the administration thereof, including the payment of claims.

Should the agency be unable to pay, for a period of one hundred twenty (120) days, a claim arising under a contract of mortgage insurance, the state shall make adequate provision for the payment of such claims.

Upon termination of the existence of the agency, all rights and properties shall pass to and be vested in the state.

Acts 1973, ch. 313, §§ 3-5; modified; 1974, ch. 579, § 2; 1975, ch. 339, § 3; 1976, ch. 797, § 2; 1976, ch. 806, § 1(56); 1977, ch. 360, § 3; T.C.A., §§ 13-2203, 13-2204, 13-2205; Acts 1988, ch. 901, §§ 4, 5; 1988, ch. 1013, § 10.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 1988, ch. 901, § 6 provided that, notwithstanding the provisions of § 4-29-112, or any other law to the contrary, the former Tennessee housing rehabilitation corporation, created by § 13-22-103, shall terminate and cease all activities by August 31, 1988.

13-22-104. Powers.

In addition to specific powers provided elsewhere by law, the agency may:

Sue and be sued;

Have a seal and alter it at will;

Make contracts and other instruments;

Make bylaws, rules and regulations governing its operations and the use of its property and facilities;

Acquire, hold, mortgage, pledge and dispose of real or personal property;

Appoint officers, agents and employees, prescribe their powers and duties and fix their compensation;

Promote and encourage the investment in, and rehabilitation of, housing accommodations, primarily for persons of low and moderate income, and encourage and assist private sponsors and governmental agencies in such activities;

Enter into commitments to insure mortgages and contracts of mortgage insurance and fulfill its obligations and enforce its rights under any insurance so furnished, including termination of such contracts or commitments as provided herein and as provided by rules and regulations adopted by the agency;

Enter into agreements to pay annual sums in lieu of taxes to any political subdivision of the state with respect to any real property owned by the agency;

Accept any gifts, grants or loans of funds or property or financial or other aid of any form from the state or federal government or any agency thereof or from any other sources and to comply with the terms and conditions thereof, not inconsistent with this chapter; provided, that any of the gifts, grants or loans of funds or property or financial or other aid of any form received pursuant to this chapter for subsequent use at the local level may be permitted by the agency to be administered by local housing authorities that have in existence or that create rehabilitation divisions, and the agency may, if it deems appropriate, contract with the local housing authorities to administer such programs that are financed as stated herein;

Engage the services of any state department on a contract basis for rendering staff or professional assistance, and engage the services of any private person, firm or agency on a contract basis for rendering staff or professional assistance. Section 4-4-109 shall govern the transfer of costs associated with such interdepartmental services;

Conduct its affairs, manage its business, and do any and all things necessary in aid of its purposes, powers and duties as defined by law;

Subject to § 13-22-105, fix premium charges, and application and commitment fees, for the insurance of mortgages and commitments to insure mortgages and levy such fees and charges as the agency may determine, the payment of which shall be a condition to the issuance of the insurance or commitment to insure;

Pay, pursue to final collection, compromise, waive or release any right, title, claim, lien or demand, however acquired, including any equity or right of redemption;

Foreclose or require the foreclosure of any mortgage in default or commence any action to protect or enforce any right conferred upon it by any law, mortgage, contract or other agreement, and bid for and purchase such property at any foreclosure or at any other sale, or otherwise acquire or take possession of any such property;

Deal with, including hold, administer, manage, rent, repair, insure, or sell, lease or otherwise dispose of any property, at public or private sale, conveyed to or acquired by the agency and enter into agreements with the state, or with any person, firm, partnership or agency, either public or private, for the purpose of causing any such property to be dealt with in such manner;

Procure insurance against any loss in connection with its property and other assets and procure reinsurance in connection with its obligations, all in such amounts and from such insurers as it deems desirable;

Consent to the modification, with respect to rate of interest, time of payment of any installment of principal or interest, security, or any other term, of any mortgage, mortgage loan, mortgage loan commitment, contract or agreement of any kind which the agency has insured or to which the agency is a party;

Sell, at public or private sale, any mortgage, mortgage participation or other obligation held by the agency;

Invest any funds held in reserve, or any funds not required for immediate use or disbursement, at the discretion of the agency, in obligations of the state or federal government, obligations, the principal and interest of which are guaranteed by the state or federal government, or obligations of agencies of the federal government which may from time to time be legally purchased by the state treasurer as investments of funds belonging to the state, or in insured accounts as provided in § 13-22-108(d);

Engage the services of consultants on a contract basis for rendering professional and technical assistance and advice; but no consultant costs shall be passed on to the borrower as a direct loan cost or charge; and

Provide technical or professional assistance to further the purpose of the agency.

Acts 1973, ch. 313, § 6; 1974, ch. 579, § 3; 1975, ch. 339, § 4; T.C.A., §§ 13-2204, 13-2206; Acts 1988, ch. 901, § 4.

13-22-105. Mortgage insurance fund — Premium reserve fund — Home repair loan insurance account.

The agency shall create and establish a mortgage insurance fund which shall be used as a revolving fund for carrying out this chapter with respect to mortgages insured hereunder and shall pay into such fund:

Any moneys appropriated, paid or otherwise, made available by the state for the purpose of such fund; and

Any other moneys which may be made available to the agency for the purpose of such fund from any other source.

All moneys held in the mortgage insurance fund, except as hereinafter provided, shall be used, as required, solely for the payment of the agency's liabilities arising from mortgages insured pursuant to this chapter; provided, that moneys in such fund shall not be withdrawn therefrom at any time in such amount as would reduce the amount of such fund to less than the mortgage insurance fund requirement, except for the purpose of paying such liabilities, as the same become due and for the payment of which other moneys of the agency are not available. Any income or interest earned by, or increment to, the mortgage insurance fund due to the investment thereof, or any amount in excess of the mortgage insurance fund requirement, may be transferred by the agency to other funds or accounts of the agency to the extent that it does not reduce the amount of the mortgage insurance fund below the mortgage insurance fund requirement.

At the close of each fiscal year and as a part of its annual report, the agency shall include a certified statement as to the condition of the mortgage insurance fund. If, as of the last day of the fiscal year, the mortgage insurance fund does not meet the mortgage insurance fund requirement as defined in § 13-22-101, the commissioner of finance and administration shall cause to be deposited in the mortgage insurance fund, from funds available to the agency, an amount of moneys sufficient to restore the fund to a level equal to the mortgage insurance fund requirement. A deficiency in the mortgage insurance fund as computed in accordance with § 13-22-101(7) during any fiscal year shall not invalidate any contracts for mortgage insurance or commitments to provide mortgage insurance outstanding at the time such deficiency occurs.

The agency shall establish and keep a fund to be known as the “premium reserve fund” for the purpose of providing revenues to the agency for payment of all administrative and other costs arising from its operations, including liabilities arising from contracts of mortgage insurance entered into by the agency.

The agency shall pay into this fund:

All moneys appropriated or otherwise made available by the state for the purpose of the fund;

All moneys received by the agency as a result of its operations, including, but not limited to, income from fees, premiums and other charges; income resulting from the investment of these and other funds; and income from the lease, rental or other disposition of real property and other assets; and

Other moneys which may be made available to the agency for the purpose of such fund from any other source.

The agency shall regulate all fees and charges which are to be paid by or charged to the mortgagor.

The agency may, from time to time, transfer for deposit in the mortgage insurance fund as established by subsection (a), moneys received by the agency and held in the premium reserve fund which are in excess of the amounts required to pay the agency's operating and administrative expenses, including liabilities arising from contracts of mortgage insurance entered into by the agency.

The agency may invest moneys held in the fund created by this section in investments and accounts in accordance with this chapter; provided, that such investments shall be payable within such times as the funds may be needed to meet liabilities incurred by the agency. The agency may establish separate accounts under the premium reserve fund for such purposes as the agency may deem proper.

The agency shall establish a special account, to be known as the home repair loan insurance account, and may pay into this account moneys appropriated and made available by the state, and other moneys which may be available from any other source. All moneys held in the home repair loan insurance account shall be used by the agency to meet its liabilities on contracts made by it pursuant to this section and upon such terms and conditions as established by the agency.

The agency is authorized to enter into contracts of home repair loan insurance with approved financial institutions on home repair loans, provided:

The term of the loan does not exceed ten (10) years and the principal will be fully amortized over the term of the loan in substantially equal monthly payments;

The principal amount of the loan does not exceed ten thousand dollars ($10,000) per dwelling unit;

The loan bears interest, exclusive of premium charges permitted by the agency, at a rate not in excess of the legal rate for such loans in this state;

The proceeds of the loan have been or will be used solely in connection with the alteration, improvement, or repair of the housing accommodation which is the subject of the loan and, upon completion of the alteration, improvement, or repair work, the owner shall certify that the loan proceeds have been used for such work;

All alteration, improvement, or repair work has been or will be completed in substantial compliance with all applicable building or housing codes, fire ordinances, or health regulations;

The housing accommodation which is the subject of an insured home repair loan is located in a code enforcement area, older urban neighborhood, an area of historic or community importance, a rural community, or an area specifically designated by the agency as a reinvestment area; and

The agency shall not at any time insure or cause the state to be obligated upon unsecured promissory notes or third mortgage loans.

The agency may enter into contracts of home repair loan insurance; provided, that the home repair loan insurance account contains an amount of money equal to five percent (5%) of the sum of accounts insured under this section. Moneys in this account may not be withdrawn at any time in such amount as would reduce the account to less than the amount required, except for the purpose of paying claims arising under contracts of home repair loan insurance as the same become due and for the payment of which other moneys of the agency are not available. Any income or interest earned by the account due to the investment thereof, or any amount in excess of the amount required by this section, may be transferred by the agency to other funds or accounts of the agency.

Acts 1974, ch. 579, § 4; 1975, ch. 339, § 5; 1977, ch. 360, § 4; T.C.A., § 13-2205; Acts 1988, ch. 901, § 4.

13-22-106. Assistance by state.

The state is authorized to make or contract to make payments or loans of money to the agency for the purpose of enabling it to carry out its corporate purposes, and for the exercise of its powers. Any such payment or loan, upon receipt by the agency, shall constitute revenue of the agency, and, in the case of moneys transferred for deposit in the agency's mortgage insurance fund, shall be so deposited forthwith.

The state is authorized to make or contract to make capital or periodic subsidies to the agency. Any contract for periodic subsidies may provide for payments to be made thereunder to the date of the latest final maturity of any mortgage to be insured by the agency during a stated period, which may not exceed fifty (50) years from the date of the contract. Any such contract shall contain such other terms and conditions as the state, acting by the commissioner of finance and administration, and the agency may agree upon in furtherance of the public purposes set forth in this chapter. Any such capital or periodic subsidies shall, upon receipt by the agency, constitute revenue of the agency, and in the case of moneys transferred for deposit in the agency's mortgage insurance fund, shall be so deposited forthwith.

Acts 1974, ch. 579, § 4; T.C.A., § 13-2206; Acts 1988, ch. 901, § 4.

13-22-107. Tax exemption.

The property of the agency and its income and operations shall be exempt from taxation.

Acts 1973, ch. 313, § 7; T.C.A., § 13-2207; Acts 1988, ch. 901, § 4.

13-22-108. Reports — Examinations.

Each state officer and department shall render assistance and services as may be requested by the agency in aid of its functions.

The agency shall file with the commissioner of finance and administration, the governor, and the general assembly within one hundred twenty (120) days after the end of its fiscal year, a report of its operations, receipts and expenditures during the year, its assets and liabilities, including a schedule of outstanding insurance, as of the end of such year, and such additional information as the commissioner shall request. This report shall be open to public inspection.

The comptroller of the treasury may from time to time, and shall at least once every two (2) years, examine the books and accounts of the agency. Subject to agreements with policyholders or mortgage holders, such funds as are available to the agency for the payment of administrative expenses shall be deposited in the state treasury to ensure that the administrative operation of the agency is conducted in a manner consistent with state agencies. Nothing in this chapter shall be construed as requiring the agency to act contrary to requirements for mortgage insurers established by the Federal National Mortgage Association or by the Federal Home Loan Mortgage Corporation, or as affecting the reserve funds of the agency.

All moneys of the agency, except as otherwise authorized or provided in this chapter, shall be deposited as soon as practicable in a separate account or accounts in banks, trust companies or savings and loan associations organized under the laws of the state or the United States and doing business in the state. The moneys in such accounts shall be paid out on checks signed by such officer or employee of the agency as the agency shall authorize. All accounts shall be insured by an agency of the United States government and moneys of the agency shall be deposited in such accounts only to the extent of deposit insurance for public funds.

The state treasurer, who shall serve as treasurer of the agency, shall invest any funds not required for immediate use or disbursement, including any funds held in reserve, according to the procedures and requirements set forth in law.

Subject to agreements with policyholders or mortgage holders, the annual budget of the agency shall be prepared in accordance with title 9, chapter 4.

Acts 1973, ch. 313, § 8; 1974, ch. 579, § 5; 1975, ch. 339, § 6; 1976, ch. 797, § 1; T.C.A., § 13-2208; Acts 1988, ch. 901, § 4.

Cross-References. Reporting requirement satisfied by notice to general assembly members of publication of report, § 3-1-114.

13-22-109. Requirements for commitment — Amount — Liability of personnel.

The agency is authorized, subject to this chapter, to make commitments to insure mortgage loans and to contract to insure mortgage loans eligible for insurance hereunder, upon such terms and conditions as the agency may prescribe, provided:

Application for mortgage insurance or for a commitment for mortgage insurance has been submitted to the agency by an approved mortgagee holding or proposing to hold, an insurable mortgage on the housing accommodation;

The mortgage will have a remaining term of not more than forty (40) years from the date of the issuance of the insurance;

The mortgage bears interest, exclusive of premium charges fixed by the agency, at a rate not in excess of the legal rate for such mortgages in this state and agreed upon by the mortgagor, the mortgagee, and the agency;

The mortgage contains amortization provisions satisfactory to the agency, requiring periodic payments by the mortgagor not in excess of the mortgagor's reasonable ability to pay as determined by the agency;

The mortgage is in such form and contains such terms and provisions with respect to maturity, hazard and title insurance, repairs, alterations, maintenance, payment of taxes and assessments, default remedies, anticipation of maturity, additional and secondary liens, waiver of equitable and legal redemption rights and other matters as the agency may prescribe; and

That such mortgage insurance is necessary to enable the mortgagor to obtain the mortgage loan upon reasonable and affordable terms and conditions.

Mortgage loans insured under this chapter may be for any amount up to and including one hundred percent (100%) of the cost of rehabilitation of the housing accommodation, subject to such rules and regulations as the agency may establish. If the agency, pursuant to the terms of a contract of mortgage insurance, makes any payment upon a defaulted mortgage loan to the mortgagee thereof, the agency shall be subrogated to the rights of the mortgagee.

The directors, officers and employees of the agency shall not be subject to any personal liabilities due to any obligation or debt created or incurred by the agency.

This section shall not apply to graduated payment mortgage loans insured pursuant to § 13-22-115.

Acts 1973, ch. 313, § 9; 1975, ch. 339, § 7; T.C.A., § 13-2209; Acts 1980, ch. 790, § 3; 1988, ch. 901, § 4.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 1988, ch. 901, § 6 provided that, notwithstanding the provisions of § 4-29-112, or any other law to the contrary, the former Tennessee housing rehabilitation corporation, created by § 13-22-103, shall terminate and cease all activities by August 31, 1988.

Cross-References. Requirements for commitment to insure graduated payment mortgages, § 13-22-116.

13-22-110. Maximum aggregate amount.

The agency shall not issue a commitment to insure or a contract of mortgage insurance, at any time, if upon issuance thereof the sum of the insured amounts under the agency's outstanding mortgage insurance contracts and the amounts to be insured under the agency's outstanding commitments to insure mortgages will exceed twenty (20) times the moneys held in or credited to the mortgage insurance fund pursuant to § 13-22-105(a).

Acts 1973, ch. 313, § 10; 1975, ch. 339, § 8; T.C.A., § 13-2210; Acts 1988, ch. 901, § 4.

13-22-111. Guaranty account.

The agency shall establish a special account, to be known as the guaranty account, and shall pay into this account all moneys appropriated and made available by the state for the purposes of the account, and other moneys which may be made available for the purposes of the account from any other source. All moneys held in the guaranty account shall be used by the agency to meet its liabilities on contracts made by it pursuant to § 13-22-112 and upon such terms and conditions as the agency may prescribe.

Acts 1973, ch. 313, § 11; 1975, ch. 339, § 9; T.C.A., § 13-2211; Acts 1988, ch. 901, § 4.

13-22-112. Mortgage insurance — Interest assistance.

The agency may provide interest assistance to any financial institution with respect to any loan insured by the agency pursuant to this chapter, except mortgages insured pursuant to § 13-22-115. This assistance, subject to the limitation of funds available pursuant to § 13-22-111, may be in amounts determined by the agency to be necessary to enable the owner to afford the interest cost of the mortgage loan.

A contract for interest assistance shall constitute an undertaking by the state to grant to the mortgagee of an insured mortgage loan, for a term not to exceed the term of the mortgage loan, periodic supplements to the interest payable by the owner. Such periodic supplements when added to the interest payments made by the owner shall not exceed the interest rate established pursuant to § 13-22-109(a)(3).

Prior to entering into a mortgage interest assistance contract, the agency shall determine that such assistance is required to avoid default and foreclosure, that no other remedy exists on affordable and reasonable terms, and that the owner meets other such qualifications as the agency may require.

Any contract for interest assistance may also contain other conditions not inconsistent with this chapter, as may be prescribed by the agency by regulation or as may be agreed on by the financial institution, the agency and the owner.

Payments of interest assistance shall be made directly to the mortgagee of the insured mortgage loan, shall not be subject to the control of the owner, and shall not constitute income to the owner for taxation or other purposes.

The agency shall, with the owner and the mortgagee, review from time to time the terms of such contract and the need for assistance thereunder and make any appropriate revisions or termination.

Acts 1973, ch. 313, § 12; 1975, ch. 339, § 10; T.C.A., § 13-2212; Acts 1980, ch. 790, § 4; 1988, ch. 901, § 4.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 1988, ch. 901, § 6 provided that, notwithstanding the provisions of § 4-29-112, or any other law to the contrary, the former Tennessee housing rehabilitation corporation, created by § 13-22-103, shall terminate and cease all activities by August 31, 1988.

13-22-113. Temporary vacation of premises.

The chief executive officer, with respect to any housing accommodation which is the subject of an application for mortgage insurance under this chapter, may order any tenants temporarily to vacate the premises during the course of the rehabilitation, if the chief executive officer finds it necessary to have the premises vacated to proceed with the rehabilitation.

Any tenants who have been temporarily ordered to vacate the premises shall have the right of reinstatement therein, after the rehabilitation has been completed.

Acts 1973, ch. 313, § 13; 1976, ch. 797, § 3; T.C.A., § 13-2213.

13-22-114. Inconsistency with other laws — Liberal construction.

Insofar as this chapter is inconsistent with any other law, general, special or local, this chapter shall be controlling. It is the intent of the general assembly that this chapter be construed liberally so as to effectuate the public and governmental purpose thereof.

Acts 1974, ch. 579, § 6; T.C.A., § 13-2214.

13-22-115. Graduated payment mortgages — Insurance authorized.

The agency may insure mortgages containing provisions for varying rates of amortization corresponding to anticipated variations in family income to the extent such mortgages:

Have promise for expanding housing opportunities or meeting special needs; and

Can be developed to include any safeguards for mortgagors or purchasers that may be necessary to offset special risks of such mortgages.

Graduated payment mortgages insured by the agency pursuant to this section shall comply with the rules and regulations promulgated by the secretary of housing and urban development pursuant to 12 U.S.C. § 1715b and 12 U.S.C. § 1715z-10 [repealed]; provided, that this section shall only be applicable to first mortgages.

Acts 1980, ch. 790, § 1; 1988, ch. 901, § 4.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 1988, ch. 901, § 6 provided that, notwithstanding the provisions of § 4-29-112, or any other law to the contrary, the former Tennessee housing rehabilitation corporation, created by § 13-22-103, shall terminate and cease all activities by August 31, 1988.

Former 12 U.S.C. § 1715z-10, referred to in this section, was repealed by Act July 30, 2008, P.L. 110-289, Div B, Title I, Subtitle A, § 2120(a)(7), 122 Stat. 2835.

13-22-116. Graduated payment mortgages — Requirements for commitment to insure.

For the purposes of this chapter, the agency is authorized to make commitments to insure mortgage loans and to contract to insure mortgage loans eligible hereunder upon such terms and conditions as the agency may prescribe, provided:

Application for mortgage insurance or for a commitment for mortgage insurance has been submitted to the agency by an approved mortgagee holding, or proposing to hold, an insurable mortgage on the housing accommodation;

The mortgage will have a remaining term of not more than forty (40) years from the date of the issuance of the insurance;

The mortgage bears interest, exclusive of premium charges fixed by the agency, at a rate not in excess of the legal rate for such mortgages in this state and agreed upon by the mortgagor, the mortgagee, and the agency;

The mortgage contains a provision satisfactory to the agency varying the rate of amortization to correspond to an anticipated variation in the mortgagor's income;

The mortgage is in such form and contains such terms and provisions with respect to maturity, hazard and title insurance, repairs, alterations, maintenance, payment of taxes and assessments, default remedies, anticipation of maturity, additional and secondary liens, waiver of equitable and legal redemption rights and other matters as the agency may prescribe; and

Such mortgage insurance is necessary to enable the mortgagor to obtain the mortgage loan upon reasonable and affordable terms and conditions.

If the agency, pursuant to the terms of a contract of mortgage insurance, makes any payment upon a defaulted mortgage loan to the mortgagee thereof, the agency shall be subrogated to the rights of the mortgagee.

The directors, officers and employees of the agency shall not be subject to any personal liabilities due to any obligation or debt created or incurred by the agency.

Acts 1980, ch. 790, § 2; 1988, ch. 901, § 4.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 1988, ch. 901, § 6 provided that, notwithstanding the provisions of § 4-29-112, or any other law to the contrary, the former Tennessee housing rehabilitation corporation, created by § 13-22-103, shall terminate and cease all activities by August 31, 1988.